Nebraska, session 109, LB1001A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $-0- from the Compulsive
Gamblers Assistance Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $3,217,273 from the Compulsive
Gamblers Assistance Fund for FY2026-27 to the State Racing and Gaming
Commission, for Program 166, to aid in carrying out the provisions of
Legislative Bill 1001, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $-0- for FY2025-26 or
$154,334 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 2. Laws 2025, LB261, section 76, is amended to read:
Sec. 76. AGENCY NO. 16 — DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
Program No. 164 - Gamblers Assistance Program
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 3,208,877 -0-
CASH FUND 3,208,877 3,217,273
PROGRAM TOTAL 3,208,877 -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL 3,208,877 3,217,273
SALARY LIMIT 149,532 -0-
SALARY LIMIT 149,532 154,334
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26 $-0-
$1,150,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $-0-
$1,150,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 3. Original Laws 2025, LB261, section 76, is repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-